Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.520

Copies of entries, documents to be furnished—Copies as prima facie evidence.

Upon request and at such reasonable charges as the director prescribes, the director shall furnish to any person photostatic or other copies (certified under his or her seal of office if requested) of any entry in the register or any document which is a matter of public record. In any proceeding or prosecution under this chapter, any copy so certified is prima facie evidence of the contents of the entry or document certified.

[ 2011 c 336 s 596; 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 37; 1959 c 282 s 52.]